Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Military Burial Honor Guards

36.390.
Legislative findings on military burial honors — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky recognizes the need to provide for honorable burials for Kentuckians who have served their state and nation in the Armed Forces. Historically these burial services have been conducted by the active military units in Kentucky, the Kentucky National Guard, the military reserves, and the veterans’ service organizations. However, increasing death rates, declining military resources, and an aging membership of veterans’ service organizations present the need for new initiatives in support of military burial honors.

To correct this situation, and recognizing the immediate need, the Department of Military Affairs shall oversee a Military Burial Honor Guard Program, in coordination with the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The Department of Military Affairs, in consultation with and as a supplement to the Department of Defense, active United States military commands in Kentucky, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, the military reserves, and veterans service organizations, shall implement and administer the provisions of KRS

36.390

to

36.396

through the promulgation of administrative regulations. These regulations shall be in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A and shall comply with and supplement the Department of Defense and the Armed Services’ guidance.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 378, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

36.392.
Military burial honor guard trust fund.

There is established and created in the State Treasury a fund entitled the “Miliary Burial Honor Guard Trust Fund” to provide funds to offset the costs of the Military Burial Honor Guard Program. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private. Moneys deposited in the fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the Adjutant General or his representative. Any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9), and any income earned from the investments along with the unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall not lapse and shall be deemed a trust and agency account and made available solely for the purposes and benefits of the Military Burial Honor Guard Program.

The fund shall be used to support the costs, beyond federal reimbursements, that the Department of Military Affairs and the Department of Veterans’ Affairs incur and deem necessary in providing and supporting the personnel and activities of KRS

36.390

to

36.396

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 378, § 2, effective July 1, 2000.

36.394.
Duties of Department of Military Affairs and Department of Veterans’ Affairs relating to burial honors.

The Department of Military Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement the Military Burial Honor Guard Program.

The Department of Military Affairs shall coordinate military burial honors for those who are determined to be eligible by federal and state regulations.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall coordinate the Military Burial Honor Guard Program with veterans’ service organizations, Kentucky veterans and their dependents, and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in support of the Department of Military Affairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 378, § 3, effective July 1, 2000.

36.396.
Excused absences for secondary school students who participate in Military Burial Honor Guard Program — Inclusion in instructional program.

Recognizing the participation of secondary school students in the Military Burial Honor Guard Program, excused absences may be granted by local school boards to students of secondary school JROTC programs or other students who participate in the Military Burial Honor Guard Program. This includes time spent training, traveling, and participating in the Military Burial Honor Guard Program.

Local school boards may also adopt a policy to allow students to participate in the Military Burial Honor Guard Program as a part of the instructional program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 378, § 4, effective July 1, 2000.